test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-almaj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - ålmaj: # N_CONTR_AJA (no grade alternations in normative version)
    ålmaj+N+Sg+Nom: ålmaj
    ålmaj+N+Sg+Gen: [ålma, ålbma]
    ålmaj+N+Sg+Acc: [ålmav, ålbmav]
    ålmaj+N+Sg+Ill: [ålmaj, ålbmaj]
    ålmaj+N+Sg+Ine: [ålman, ålbman]
    ålmaj+N+Sg+Ela: [ålmast, ålmas, ålbmast, ålbmas]
    ålmaj+N+Sg+Com: [ålmajn, ålbmajn]
    ålmaj+N+Pl+Nom: [ålma, ålbma]
    ålmaj+N+Pl+Gen: [ålmaj, ålbmaj]
    ålmaj+N+Pl+Acc: [ålmajd, ålbmajd]
    ålmaj+N+Pl+Ill: [ålmajda, ålbmajda]
    ålmaj+N+Pl+Ine: [ålmajn, ålbmajn]
    ålmaj+N+Pl+Ela: [ålmajst, ålmajs, ålbmajst, ålbmajs]
    ålmaj+N+Pl+Com: [ålmaj, ålmajgum, ålbmaj, ålbmajgum]
    ålmaj+N+Ess: [ålman, ålbman]
    ålmaj+N+Abe: [ålmadak, ålbmadak]

##I need to deal with this variation later...
#  Noun - ålmaj: # -kontrakta med stv och utan vokf
#    ålmaj+N+Sg+Nom: ålmaj
#    ålmaj+N+Sg+Gen: [ålma, ålbma]
#    ålmaj+N+Sg+Acc: [ålmav, ålbmav]
#    ålmaj+N+Sg+Ill: [ålmaj, ålbmaj]
#    ålmaj+N+Sg+Ine: [ålman, ålbman]
#    ålmaj+N+Sg+Ela: [ålmast, ålbmast]
#    ålmaj+N+Sg+Com: [ålmajn, ålbmajn]
#    ålmaj+N+Pl+Nom: [ålma, ålbma]
#    ålmaj+N+Pl+Gen: [ålmaj, ålbmaj]
#    ålmaj+N+Pl+Acc: [ålmajd, ålbmajd]
#    ålmaj+N+Pl+Ill: [ålmajda, ålbmajda]
#    ålmaj+N+Pl+Ine: [ålmajn, ålbmajn]
#    ålmaj+N+Pl+Ela: [ålmajst, ålbmajst]
#    ålmaj+N+Pl+Com: [ålmaj, ålbmaj]
#    ålmaj+N+Ess: [ålman, ålbman]
#    ålmaj+N+Abe: [ålmadak, ålbmadak]
